District of Columbia statutes.
8-1841.06

Signage.

An individual, business, or entity that utilizes a commercial guard dog shall post a sign in plain view alerting the public to the presence of a commercial guard dog and shall include the name of the entity responsible for the animal and a 24-hour emergency telephone.

History

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 406, 55 DCR 9186